Vermont, session 2025-2026, S203.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1210 is amended to read:
§ 1210. PENALTIES
* * *
(b) First offense. A person who violates section 1201 of this title may be
fined not more than $750.00 or imprisoned for not more than two years, or
both.
(c) Second offense. A person convicted of violating who violates section
1201 of this title who has been convicted of another violation of that section
within the last 20 years preceding the date of the second violation shall be
fined not more than $1,500.00 or imprisoned not more than two years, or both.
At least 80 hours of community service shall be performed, or 60 consecutive
hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not be
suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence, except that credit for
a sentence of imprisonment may be received for time served in a residential
alcohol facility pursuant to sentence if the program is successfully completed.
(d) Third offense. A person convicted of violating who violates section
1201 of this title who has previously been convicted two times of a violation of
VT LEG #388065 v.1

AS PASSED BY SENATE S.203
2026 Page 2 of 3
that section, including at least one violation conviction within the last 20 years
preceding the date of the third violation, shall be fined not more than $2,500.00
or imprisoned not more than five years, or both. At least 96 consecutive hours
of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not be suspended or
deferred or served as a supervised sentence, except that credit for a sentence of
imprisonment may be received for time served in a residential alcohol facility
pursuant to sentence if the program is successfully completed. The court may
impose a sentence that does not include a term of imprisonment or that does
not require that the 96 hours of imprisonment be served consecutively only if
the court makes written findings on the record that such a sentence will serve
the interests of justice and public safety.
(e) Fourth or subsequent offense.
(1) A person convicted of violating who violates section 1201 of this
title who has previously been convicted three or more times of a violation of
that section, including at least one violation conviction within the last 20 years
preceding the date of the fourth violation, shall be fined not more than
$5,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 10 years, or both. At least 192
consecutive hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not
be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence, except that credit
for a sentence of imprisonment may be received for time served in a residential
alcohol treatment facility pursuant to sentence if the program is successfully
VT LEG #388065 v.1

AS PASSED BY SENATE S.203
2026 Page 3 of 3
completed. The court shall not impose a sentence that does not include a term
of imprisonment unless the court makes written findings on the record that
there are compelling reasons why such a sentence will serve the interests of
justice and public safety.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #388065 v.1